Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.430

Change of registered agent by entity.

(1) A represented entity may change its registered agent or other information on file under RCW 23.95.415(1) by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change executed by the entity which states:

(a) The name of the entity; and

(b) The information required under RCW 23.95.415(1).

(2) The interest holders or governors of a domestic entity need not approve the filing of:

(a) A statement of change under this section; or

(b) A similar filing changing the registered agent or registered office, if any, of the entity in any other jurisdiction.

(3) A statement of change under this section designating a new registered agent must be accompanied by the new registered agent's consent in a record, either on the statement or attached to it in a manner and form as the secretary of state may prescribe, to the appointment.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1407.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.